Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 508 of Title 69, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the Evacuation
Vehicle Access Corridor Act.
B. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Transportation to be designated
the "Evacuation Vehicle Access Corridor Revolving Fund" or "EVAC
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2285 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

year limitations, and shall consist of all monies directed for
deposit to the fund by law. All monies accruing to the credit of
said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended
by the Oklahoma Department of Transportation in accordance with the
provisions provided in Section C of this act. Expenditures from
said fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
C. 1. There is hereby established the Evacuation Vehicle
Access Corridor Grant Program, which may also be cited as the "EVAC
Grant Program";
2. The Oklahoma Department of Transportation shall establish
and administer the EVAC Grant Program to support the state purpose
of ensuring the health and safety of the residents of Oklahoma
living in geographically landlocked basins by creating evacuation
corridors. Such program shall embody the following procedures and
criteria:
a. the Department shall create and make available to
counties of the state a standardized Evacuation
Vehicle Access Corridor grant application;
b. to be eligible for a grant from the EVAC Grant
Program, a county must demonstrate a material need to
construct a county road in a qualified area;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2285 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

c. grant amounts awarded under the provisions of this act
shall not exceed the cumulative total of funds
directed for deposit to the EVAC Fund created in
subsection B of this act.
D. As used in the Evacuation Vehicle Access Corridor Act:
1. "Landlocked" means almost or entirely surrounded by land,
which lacks practical entry and egress by motor vehicles;
2. "Qualified area" means a landlocked basin in this state with
no fewer than two thousand (2,000) residents, and that has one or
fewer roads of entry or egress maintained by a state, county, town
or municipality road system or systems.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 23, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2285 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)